District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-590

Discharge as cured; restoration to legal status.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 761, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 567, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 150(c)(3)
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-283, § 2(hh), 50 DCR 917

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 21-590.
1973 Ed., § 21-590.

Temporary Amendment of Section

Section 2(ff) of D.C. Law 14-131 amended this section to read as follows: “§ 21-590. Persons committed prior to the effective date the Mental Health Commitment Temporary Act of 2002. Any person committed for an indeterminate period of time pursuant to section 21-545 prior to the effective date of the Mental Health Commitment Temporary Act of 2002, passed on 2nd reading on February 5, 2002 (Enrolled version of Bill 14-502), shall have his commitment terminate no more than 18 months from the effective date of the Mental Health Commitment Temporary act of 2002 unless the chief clinical officer of the Department, facility, hospital, or mental health provider has petitioned for recommitment under section 21-545.01. The petition for recommitment of those persons who were committed prior to the effective date of the Mental Health Commitment Temporary Act of 2002 may be filed at any time during the 18-month period, but no later than 60 days prior to the expiration of the period.”
Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 14-131 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2(b) of D.C. Law 14-187 amended this section to read as follows: “§ 21-590. Interim provisions for term of commitment. Any person committed for an indeterminate period of time pursuant to section 21-545 shall have his commitment terminate no more than 18 months from January 30, 2002 unless the chief clinical officer of the Department, facility, hospital, or mental health provider has petitioned for recommitment under section 21-545.01. The petition for recommitment of those persons who were committed for an indeterminate period of time pursuant to section 21-545 may be filed at any time during the 18-month period, but no later than 60 days prior to the expiration of the period.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 14-187 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(ff) of Mental Health Commitment Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-265, January 30, 2002, 49 DCR 1450).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(ff) of Mental Health Commitment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-350, April 24, 2002, 49 DCR 4417).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Mental Health Commitment Clarification Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-363, May 20, 2002, 49 DCR 5070).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(b) of Mental Health Commitment Clarification Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-416, July 17, 2002, 49 DCR 7385).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(hh) of Mental Health Civil Commitment Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-546, December 12, 2002, 50 DCR 199).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2(hh) of Mental Health Civil Commitment Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-41, March 24, 2003, 50 DCR 2784).